Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2506
Insurance required.

No animal welfare organization shall accept controlled substances under a collaborating veterinarian agreement unless, at the time of the acceptance, it has in effect third-party liability insurance covering damages resulting from the improper handling or control of controlled substances.

Laws 1999, LB 573, § 6.